tr: Bileşenin fiziksel formu: Balsam; Boncuklar; Kristaller; Granüller; Sıvı; Macun; Pelet; Toz; Reçine; Katı; Balmumu; Diğer
hr-HR: Fizički oblik sastojka: Balzam; Perlice; Kristali; Granule; Tekućina; Pasta; Peleti; Prah; Smola; Kruto; Vosak; Ostalo
es: Forma física del ingrediente: Bálsamo; Perlas; Cristales; Gránulos; Líquido; Pasta; Pellets; Polvo; Resina; Sólido; Cera; Otro
ja: 成分の物理的形態: バルサム; ビーズ; 結晶; 顆粒; 液体; ペースト; ペレット; パウダー; 樹脂; 固体; ワックス; その他
zh-CN: 成分物理形态: 香脂; 珠状; 结晶; 颗粒; 液体; 膏状; 丸状; 粉末; 树脂; 固体; 蜡状; 其他
th: รูปแบบทางกายภาพของส่วนผสม: บาลซัม; เม็ดปัด; ผลึก; เกล็ด; ของเหลว; เพสต์; เม็ด; ผง; เรซิน; ของแข็ง; แว็กซ์; อื่นๆ
en: Ingredient physical form: Balsam; Beads; Crystals; Granules; Liquid; Paste; Pellets; Powder; Resin; Solid; Wax; Other
sk-SK: Fyzická forma zložky: Balzam; Perličky; Kryštály; Granule; Kvapalina; Pasta; Pelety; Prášok; Živica; Pevná látka; Vosk; Iné
bg-BG: Физична форма на съставката: Балсам; Перли; Кристали; Гранули; Течност; Паста; Пелети; Прах; Смола; Твърдо вещество; Восък; Други
fi: Ainesosan fyysinen olomuoto: Balsami; Helmet; Kiteet; Rakeet; Neste; Tahna; Pelletit; Jauhe; Hartsi; Kiinteä; Vaha; Muu
sv: Ingrediensens fysiska form: Balsam; Pärlor; Kristaller; Granulat; Vätska; Pasta; Pellets; Pulver; Harts; Fast; Vax; Övrigt
nb: Ingrediensens fysiske form: Balsam; Perler; Krystaller; Granulat; Væske; Pasta; Pellets; Pulver; Harpiks; Fast form; Voks; Annet
it: Forma fisica dell'ingrediente: Balsamo; Perle; Cristalli; Granuli; Liquido; Pasta; Pellet; Polvere; Resina; Solido; Cera; Altro
pt-PT: Forma física do ingrediente: Bálsamo; Esferas; Cristais; Grânulos; Líquido; Pasta; Pellets; Pó; Resina; Sólido; Cera; Outro
da: Ingrediensens fysiske form: Balsam; Perler; Krystaller; Granulat; Væske; Pasta; Piller; Pulver; Harpiks; Fast stof; Voks; Andet
pl: Fizyczna forma składnika: Balsam; Kulki; Kryształy; Granulki; Płyn; Pasta; Pellet; Proszek; Żywica; Ciało stałe; Wosk; Inne
el: Φυσική μορφή συστατικού: Βάλσαμο; Σφαιρίδια; Κρύσταλλοι; Κόκκοι; Υγρό; Πάστα; Πέλετ; Σκόνη; Ρητίνη; Στερεό; Κερί; Άλλο
lt-LT: Ingrediento fizinė forma: Balzamas; Karoliukai; Kristalai; Granulės; Skystis; Pasta; Peletės; Milteliai; Derva; Kietas; Vaškas; Kita
zh-TW: 原料實體形式: 香脂; 珠狀; 結晶; 顆粒; 液態; 膏狀; 丸狀; 粉末; 樹脂; 固態; 蠟狀; 其他
fr: Forme de l’ingrédient: Baume; Billes; Cristaux; Granulés; Liquide; Pâte; Pastilles; Poudre; Résine; Solide; Cire; Autre
pt-BR: Ingrediente forma física: Bálsamo; Esferas; Cristais; Grânulos; Líquido; Pasta; Pellets; Pó; Resina; Sólido; Cera; Outro
hu: Összetevő fizikai formája: Balzsam; Gyöngyök; Kristályok; Granulátum; Folyadék; Paszta; Pellet; Por; Gyanta; Szilárd; Viasz; Egyéb
ko: 성분의 물리적 형태: 발삼; 비즈; 크리스털; 과립; 액체; 페이스트; 펠릿; 분말; 수지; 고체; 왁스; 기타
sl-SI: Fizična oblika sestavine: Balzam; Kroglice; Kristali; Zrnca; Tekočina; Pasta; Peleti; Prah; Smola; Trdna snov; Vosek; Drugo
vi: Dạng vật lý của nguyên liệu: Nhựa thơm; Hạt; Tinh thể; Hạt nhỏ; Chất lỏng; Dạng sệt; Viên nén; Bột; Nhựa cây; Chất rắn; Sáp; Khác
ro-RO: Forma fizică a ingredientului: Balsam; Perle; Cristale; Granule; Lichid; Pastă; Pelete; Pudră; Rășină; Solid; Ceară; Altele
cs: Fyzická forma složky: Balzám; Kuličky; Krystaly; Granule; Kapalina; Pasta; Pelety; Prášek; Pryskyřice; Pevná látka; Vosk; Jiné
de: Physische Form der Zutat: Balsam; Perlen; Kristalle; Granulat; Flüssigkeit; Paste; Pellets; Pulver; Harz; Feststoff; Wachs; Sonstige
nl: Ingrediënt fysieke vorm: Balsem; Parels; Kristallen; Granulaat; Vloeibaar; Pasta; Pellets; Poeder; Hars; Vast; Was; Overige
ru: Физическая форма ингредиента: Бальзам; Шарики; Кристаллы; Гранулы; Жидкость; Паста; Пеллеты; Порошок; Смола; Твердое вещество; Воск; Другое